Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2699.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 45-24-46.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 45-24 entitled "Zoning
Ordinances" is hereby amended to read as follows:
45-24-46.1. Inclusionary zoning.
(a) A zoning ordinance requiring the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a
development shall provide that the housing will be affordable housing, as defined in § 42-128-
8.1(d)(1); that the affordable housing will constitute not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the total
units proposed for the development; and that the units will remain affordable for a period of not
less than thirty (30) years from initial occupancy enforced through a land lease and/or deed
restriction enforceable by the municipality and the state of Rhode Island. A zoning ordinance that
requires the inclusion of affordable housing as part of a development shall specify the threshold in
which the inclusion of affordable housing is required, but in no event shall a minimum threshold
triggering the inclusion of affordable housing be higher than ten (10) dwelling units. The total
number of units for the development may include less than fifteen percent (15%) affordable units
after the density bonus described in subsection (c) of this section is determined. A municipality
shall not limit the number of bedrooms for applications submitted under this section to anything
less than three (3) bedrooms per dwelling unit for single-family dwelling units.
(b) A zoning ordinance that includes inclusionary zoning may provide that the affordable
housing must be built on-site or it may allow for one or more alternative methods of production,
including, but not limited to: off-site construction or rehabilitation; donation of land suitable for

development of the required affordable units; and/or the payment of a fee in lieu of the construction
or provision of affordable housing units.
(c) Density bonus, zoning incentives, and municipal subsidies. For all projects subject
to inclusionary zoning, subject to applicable setback, lot width, or frontage requirements or the
granting of relief from the same, a municipality shall allow the addition of one market rate unit for
each affordable unit required and the minimum lot area per dwelling unit normally required in the
applicable zoning district shall be reduced by that amount necessary to accommodate the
development. Larger density bonuses for the provision of an increased percentage of affordable
housing in a development may be provided by a municipality in the zoning ordinance. The total
number of units for the development shall equal the number originally proposed, including the
required affordable units, plus the additional units that constitute the density bonus. Local
regulations shall provide for reasonable relief from dimensional requirements to accommodate the
bonus density under this section. A municipality shall provide, and an applicant may request,
additional zoning incentives and/or municipal government subsidies as defined in § 45-53-3 to
offset differential costs of affordable units. Available zoning incentives and municipal government
subsidies may be listed in the zoning ordinance, but shall not be an exclusive list. Notwithstanding
any provisions of this section, the town of Johnston shall be allowed to determine its density
bonuses based upon its underlying zoning.
(1) Inclusionary zoning requirements shall not be applied where there is a limitation on the
development density at the subject property under the regulations of a state agency, such as the
coastal resources management council or department of environmental management that prevents
the use of the density bonus set forth in this section.
(d) Fee-in-lieu. To the extent a municipality provides an option for the payment of a fee-
in-lieu of the construction or provision of affordable housing, and an application seeks to utilize
fee-in-lieu, the use of such fee shall be the choice of the developer or builder applied on a per-unit
basis and may be used for new developments, purchasing property and/or homes, rehabilitating
properties, or any other manner that creates additional low- or moderate-income housing as defined
in § 45-53-3(9).
(1) Eligibility for density bonus. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, an
application that utilizes a fee-in-lieu, off-site construction or rehabilitation, or donation of land
suitable for development of the required affordable units shall not be eligible for the density bonus
outlined in this section.
(2) An application that seeks to utilize a fee-in-lieu of the construction or provision of
affordable housing must be reviewed by the planning board or commission and is not eligible for
LC005860 - Page 2 of 4

administrative review under the Rhode Island Land Development and Subdivision Review
Enabling Act of 1992, codified at §§ 45-23-25 — 45-23-74.
(3) Amount of fee-in-lieu. For affordable single-family homes and condominium units,
the per-unit fee shall be the difference between the maximum affordable sales price for a family of
four (4) earning eighty percent (80%) of the area median income as determined annually by the
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development and the average cost of developing a single
unit of affordable housing. The average cost of developing a single unit of affordable housing shall
be determined annually based on the average, per-unit development cost of affordable homes
financed by Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation (RIHMFC) over the previous
three (3) years, excluding existing units that received preservation financing.
(i) Notwithstanding subsection (d)(3) of this section, in no case shall the per-unit fee for
affordable single-family homes and condominium units be less than forty thousand dollars
($40,000).
(4) Use of fee-in-lieu. The municipality shall deposit all in-lieu payments into restricted
accounts that shall be allocated and spent only for the creation and development of affordable
housing within the municipality serving individuals or families at or below eighty percent (80%)
of the area median income. The municipality shall maintain a local affordable housing board to
oversee the funds in the restricted accounts and shall allocate the funds within three (3) years of
collection. The municipality shall include in the housing element of their local comprehensive plan
and shall pass by ordinance, the process it will use to allocate the funds.
(e) As an alternative to the provisions of subsection (d), the municipality may elect to
transfer in-lieu payments promptly upon receipt or within the three-year (3) period after receipt. A
municipality shall transfer all fee-in-lieu payments that are not allocated within three (3) years of
collection, including funds held as of July 1, 2025, to the executive office of housing for the purpose
of developing affordable housing within that community. Funds shall be deposited into the Housing
Production Fund established pursuant to § 42-128-2.1.
(f) [Deleted by P.L. 2025, ch. 278, art. 9, § 16.]
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005860
========
LC005860 - Page 3 of 4